Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 19. Horse Racing and Pari-Mutuel Betting.

§§ 59.1-216 through 59.1-254.

Defeated at referendum.

Editor’s note.

This chapter, relating to horse racing and pari-mutuel betting, was enacted by Acts 1978, c. 600. The 1978 act, which also enacted §

18.2-334.1

, was made subject to referendum held Nov. 7, 1978, and provided that, if approved, the act would become effective Jan. 1, 1979. The act was defeated at the referendum, and therefore never went into effect.